District of Columbia statutes.
7-1305.15

Coordination of services for dually diagnosed individuals.

If an individual is committed by the Court to DDS pursuant to this chapter or committed by the Court to the Department of Mental Health pursuant to subchapter IV of Chapter 5 of Title 21, or if an individual is temporarily placed with DDS pursuant to § 7-1303.12a during the pendency of commitment proceedings, and DDS or the Department of Mental Health has reason to believe that the committed individual or the individual temporarily placed with DDS pursuant to § 7-1303.12a is dually diagnosed as having both mental illness and an intellectual disability, DDS and the Department of Mental Health shall collaborate in assessing the individual and shall jointly provide appropriate supports and services for the individual.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 515
as added Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-199, § 2(r), 49 DCR 7647
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 301(n), 54 DCR 818
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(tt), 59 DCR 5567

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-264 substituted “DDS” for “MRDDA”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.15, see § 2(p) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-383, June 12, 2002, 49 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1305.15, see § 2(r) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-454, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8096).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 301(n) of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.